orig/nounLexcErz.lexc
LEXICON Nouns1_A_SGDET
!!2009-09-30!+Indet: Tenses1 ; !Subtract "+Abl"
+Indet: Attributes2 ; !Subtract "+Abl"
 Possessives1 ; !!!This takes us to Tenses1 as well
+Det+Sg:^нть Clitics ;
+OrthMorph+Det+Sg:^нтьсе Attributes2 ;
+Det+Sg:^нсе Attributes2 ;
+Dial+Det+Sg:^сть Clitics ;


!1!!LEXICON 
!1!!Postpositions
!1!!+NoNum+Gen+Poss+1Sgm:^м Tenses1 ;
!1!!+NoNum+Gen+Poss+1SgN:^нУ4 Tenses1 ;
!1!!+NoNum+Gen+Poss+2Sg:^тУ4 Tenses1 ;
!1!!+NoNum+Gen+Poss+3Sg:^нзО1 Tenses1 ;
!1!!+NoNum+Gen+Poss+1Pl:^нО1к Tenses1 ;
!1!!+NoNum+Gen+Poss+2Pl:^нк Tenses1 ;
!1!!+NoNum+Gen+Poss+3Pl:^ст Tenses1 ;
!1!!+Dial+NoNum+Gen+Poss+1Pl:^нО1к Tenses1 ;


LEXICON Gen-Attributes
+0Suf: Clitics ; !This means that stem is word final !!!
+LV:^V1 Gen-Attributes_1 ; !
+NoLV:^ Gen-Attributes_1 ; !

LEXICON Gen-Attributes_1

+Indet+Abl:дО1 Clitics ;
+Indet+Gen:нь Tenses1 ;
+OrthOld+Indet+Gen+Det+Pron:нсе Attributes2 ;
+OrthMorph+Indet+Gen+Det+Pron:ньсе Attributes2 ;
+OrthPhon+Indet+Gen+Det+Pron:нце Attributes2 ;



LEXICON PL_Attributes2_prep
 Tenses1 ;
 Attributes2 ;


!1!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
LEXICON Attributes1
+Indet+Nom+Sg+0Suf: Tenses1 ; !This means that stem is word final !!!
< 0:%^  %+LV:V1 "@P.LV.ON@"> Attributes1_A ; !This provides linking vowel
+NoLV:^ Attributes1_A  ; !This denies linking vowel
 Attributes2 ; !This should continue to Attribute Determinates


LEXICON Attributes1_A !
 Attributes1_B ; !This should continue to Indeterminates

LEXICON Attributes1_B !
<"@D.LV.ON@"> Attributes1_B_NoReqVow ;
<"@C.LV@"> Attributes1_B_ReqVow ;

LEXICON Attributes1_B_NoReqVow !
+Indet+Nom+Pl:^тУ4  Tenses1 ;!Is this Redundant
+Indet+Ela:^стО1 Clitics ;
+Indet+Ill:^с Clitics ;
+Indet+Transl:^кс Clitics ;

LEXICON Attributes1_B_ReqVow !
+Abe+Det+Sg:^в Clitics ;


LEXICON Attributes2
< 0:%^  %+LV:V1 "@P.LV.ON@"> Attributes2_A ; !This provides linking vowel
+NoLV:^ Attributes2_A  ; !This denies linking vowel


LEXICON Attributes2_A_LVOFF
<"@P.LV.OFF@"> Attributes2_A ;

LEXICON Attributes2_A
+Noun2: Attributes2_Determinatives ; ! Tag added to indicate pro-Noun quality of word


LEXICON Attributes2_Determinatives
<"@D.LV.ON@"> Attributes2_Determinatives_NoReqVow ;
<"@C.LV@"> Attributes2_Determinatives_ReqVow ;

LEXICON Attributes2_Determinatives_NoReqVow
+Indet+Nom+Pl:тУ4  Tenses1 ;
+Det+Pl+Nom:тне Tenses1 ;
+Det+Pl+Abl:тне^де Clitics ;
+Det+Pl+Gen:тне^нь Clitics ;
+Det+Pl+Dat:тне^нень Clitics ;
+Det+Pl+Ill:тне^с Clitics ;
+Det+Pl+Lat:тне^в Clitics ;
+Det+Pl+Prol:тне^ва Tenses1 ;
+Det+Pl+Abe:тне^втеме Tenses1 ;
+Det+Pl+Transl:тне^кс Tenses1 ;
+Det+Pl+Ine:тне^сэ Tenses1 ;
+Det+Pl+Ela:тне^стэ Tenses1 ;
+Det+Pl+Comp:тне^шка Tenses1 ;
+Prol:Г2а Attributes2_Determinatives_SG ;
+Abe:втО1мО1 Attributes2_Determinatives_SG ;
+Abl:дО1 Attributes2_Determinatives_SG ;
+Transl:ксО1 Attributes2_Determinatives_SG ;
!!2007-09-13 adding
+Abl:дО1 Clitics ;
+Ill:с Clitics ;
+Transl:кс Clitics ;
+Ine:сО1 Attributes2_Determinatives_SG ;
+Ela:стО1 Attributes2_Determinatives_SG ;
+Comp:шка Attributes2_Determinatives_SG ;
+Det+Sg+Nom:сь Tenses1 ;
+Dial+Det+Sg+Gen:сть Clitics ;
+Dial+Det+Sg+Dat:стень Clitics ;

LEXICON Attributes2_Determinatives_ReqVow

+Det+Sg+Nom:сь Tenses1 ;
+Det+Sg+Gen:нть Clitics ;
+Det+Sg+Dat:нтень Clitics ;
+Indet+Gen:нь Tenses1 ;

!!!CIRCULAR 2006-12-01
!1!+Indet+Gen+Det+Pron:нсе Attributes2 ;
!1!


LEXICON Attributes2_Determinatives_SG
+Det+Sg:^нть Clitics ;
+Det+Sg+Dial:^сть Clitics ;
!!Adding "+Indet" possibility 2006-12-01
+Indet: Clitics ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!


LEXICON Possessives1
+Indet+NoPossPx: Tenses1 ;
 Possessives2 ;

LEXICON Possessives2
+Dial+Poss+1Sgm:^м Determinatives1 ;
+Poss+1SgN+NonNomSg:^нУ4 Determinatives1 ;
+Poss+2Sg:^тУ4 Determinatives1 ;
+Poss+3Sg+NonNomSg:^нзО1 Determinatives1 ;
+Poss+3Sg+NonNomSg:^нзО1 Attributes2 ;
+Poss+1Pl:^нО1к Determinatives1_KLOSS ;
+Poss+2Pl:^нк Determinatives1_KLOSS ;
+Poss+3Pl:^ст Determinatives1 ;
+Poss+3Pl:^нст Determinatives1 ;

LEXICON Determinatives1_KLOSS
<"@P.KLOSS.ON@"> Determinatives1 ;

LEXICON Determinatives1
+DetArt:^се^ Attributes2_A_LVOFF ;
+OrthPhon+DetArt:^це^ Attributes2_A_LVOFF ;
 Tenses1 ;

LEXICON Tenses1_Prep-SG
<"@P.NUM.SG@"> Tenses1 ;
+Pred+PretII+1Sg:^линь NumBeforeClitics_Not-PL ;
+Pred+PretII+2Sg:^лить NumBeforeClitics_Not-PL ;
+Pred+PretII+3Sg:^ль NumBeforeClitics_Not-PL ;

LEXICON Tenses1_Prep-PL
<"@P.NUM.PL@"> Tenses1 ;
+Pred+Pres+1Pl:^тА2но  NumBeforeClitics_Not-SG ;
+Dial+Pred+Pres+1Pl:^тА2нок P.KLOSS.ON_NumBeforeClitics_Not-SG ;
+Pred+Pres+2Pl:^тА2до NumBeforeClitics_Not-SG ;
+Pred+PretII+1Pl:^линек P.KLOSS.ON_NumBeforeClitics_Not-SG ;
+Pred+PretII+2Pl:^лиде NumBeforeClitics_Not-SG ;
+Pred+PretII+3Pl:^льть NumBeforeClitics_Not-SG ;

LEXICON P.KLOSS.ON_NumBeforeClitics_Not-SG
<"@P.KLOSS.ON@"> NumBeforeClitics_Not-SG ;

LEXICON Tenses1_KLOSS
<"@P.KLOSS.ON@"> Tenses1 ;

LEXICON Tenses1
+NoPredx: Clitics ;
< 0:%^  %+LV:V1 "@P.LV.ON@"> Tenses1_A ; !This provides linking vowel
+NoLV:^ Tenses1_A  ; !This denies linking vowel
!!2009-09-23!< %+Pred:0 %+Pres:0 %+3Sg:0 "@D.NUM.PL@"> Clitics ;
< 0:%^ 0:А2 0:н %+Pred:0 %+Pres:0 %+1Sg:0 "@C.KLOSS@">  NumBeforeClitics_Not-PL ;
< 0:%^ 0:А2 0:т %+Pred:0 %+Pres:0 %+2Sg:0 "@C.KLOSS@">  NumBeforeClitics_Not-PL ;
< 0:%^ 0:т 0:А2 0:н 0:о %+Pred:0 %+Pres:0 %+1Pl:0 "@C.KLOSS@"> NumBeforeClitics_Not-SG ;
< 0:%^ 0:т 0:А2 0:н 0:о 0:к %+Dial:0 %+Pred:0 %+Pres:0 %+1Pl:0 "@P.KLOSS.ON@">  NumBeforeClitics_Not-SG ;
< 0:%^ 0:т 0:А2 0:д 0:о %+Pred:0 %+Pres:0 %+2Pl:0 "@C.KLOSS@"> NumBeforeClitics_Not-SG ;
< 0:%^ 0:т 0:У4 %+Pred:0 %+Pres:0 %+3Pl:0 "@C.KLOSS@">  NumBeforeClitics_Not-SG ;


LEXICON Tenses1_A
!<"@D.LV.ON@"> Tenses1_A_NoReqVow ;
<"@C.LV@"> Tenses1_A_ReqVow ;

!LEXICON Tenses1_A_NoReqVow
!!Depricating 2007-09-16
!!< 0:А2 0:н %+Pred:0 %+Pres:0 %+1Sg:0 "@D.NUM.PL@"> Clitics ;
!!< 0:А2 0:т %+Pred:0 %+Pres:0 %+2Sg:0 "@D.NUM.PL@"> Clitics ;
!!< 0:т 0:А2 0:н 0:о %+Pred:0 %+Pres:0 %+1Pl:0 "@D.NUM.SG@"> Clitics ;
!!< 0:т 0:А2 0:д 0:о %+Pred:0 %+Pres:0 %+2Pl:0 "@D.NUM.SG@"> Clitics ;
!!< 0:т 0:У4 %+Pred:0 %+Pres:0 %+3Pl:0 "@D.NUM.SG@"> Clitics ;

LEXICON NumBeforeClitics_Not-SG
<"@D.NUM.SG@"> Clitics ;

LEXICON NumBeforeClitics_Not-PL
<"@D.NUM.PL@"> Clitics ;


LEXICON Tenses1_A_ReqVow
< 0:т 0:А2 0:н 0:о %+Pred:0 %+Pres:0 %+1Pl:0 "@C.KLOSS@"> NumBeforeClitics_Not-SG ;
< 0:т 0:А2 0:н 0:о 0:к %+Dial:0 %+Pred:0 %+Pres:0 %+1Pl:0 "@C.KLOSS@"> NumBeforeClitics_Not-SG ;
< 0:т 0:А2 0:д 0:о %+Pred:0 %+Pres:0 %+2Pl:0 "@C.KLOSS@"> NumBeforeClitics_Not-SG ;
!!< 0:т 0:У4 %+Pred:0 %+Pres:0 %+3Pl:0 "@D.NUM.SG@"> Clitics ;
+Pred+PretII+1Sg:линь C-KLOSS_NumBeforeClitics_Not-PL ;
+Pred+PretII+2Sg:лить C-KLOSS_NumBeforeClitics_Not-PL ;
+Pred+PretII+3Sg:ль C-KLOSS_NumBeforeClitics_Not-PL ;
+Pred+PretII+1Pl:линек  P.KLOSS.ON_NumBeforeClitics_Not-SG ;

+Pred+PretII+2Pl:лиде C-KLOSS_NumBeforeClitics_Not-SG ;
+Pred+PretII+3Pl:льть C-KLOSS_NumBeforeClitics_Not-SG ;

LEXICON C-KLOSS_NumBeforeClitics_Not-SG
<"@C.KLOSS@"> NumBeforeClitics_Not-SG ;

LEXICON C-KLOSS_NumBeforeClitics_Not-PL
<"@C.KLOSS@"> NumBeforeClitics_Not-PL ;

LEXICON Clitics_KLOSS
<"@R.KLOSS.ON@"> Clitics ;

LEXICON Clitics
<"@R.KLOSS.ON@"> Clitics_R-KLOSS-ON ;
<"@R.BUTI.ON@"> Clitics_R-BUTI-ON ;
<"@D.BUTI.ON@"> Clitics_D-BUTI-ON ;

LEXICON Clitics_R-KLOSS-ON
+KLoss+ClitGak:^ак # ;

LEXICON Clitics_R-BUTI-ON
+CltButi:-бути  # ;

LEXICON Clitics_D-BUTI-ON
+CltGak:^Г1ак # ;
+NoClitic:0 # ;



END




"@C.NUM@"
"@C.BUTI@"
"@C.KLOSS@"
"@C.TLOSS@"

LEXICON Root
класс+Indet+Ine:классо Clitics ;
класс+Indet+Ela:классто Clitics ;
класс+Ine+Det+Sg:классонть Clitics ;
класс+Ela+Det+Sg:класстонть Clitics ;
апарсте+Neg+Adv:апарсте Clitics ;
весемнень+Pron+Q+Dat:весемнень Clitics ;
знярт+Pron+Q+Pl:знярт Clitics ;
колмоненек+Num+Coll+1Pl:колмоненек Clitics ;
кондякс+Pron+Transl:кондякс Clitics ;
пееньбачк+Adv:пееньбачк Clitics ;
чиньзельть+Prt+Temp+Pl:чиньзельть Clitics ;
ёжомарязь+Adv:ёжомарязь Clitics ;
трубком+Adv:трубком Clitics ;
штюпком+Adv:штюпком Clitics ;
эрейстэ+Adv:эрейстэ Clitics ;
аламонь-аламонь+Adv+Distr:аламонь-аламонь Clitics ;
аловбандт+Adv:аловбандт Clitics ;
аловпандт+Adv:аловпандт Clitics ;
апак+Prt+Neg:апакУ3 Tenses1 ;
бишь+Prt+ForeignNew:бишь Clitics ;
вейс+Adv+Ill:вейс Clitics ;
веревбандт+Adv:веревбандт Clitics ;
веревпандт+Adv:веревпандт Clitics ;
дюм+Ad-A:дюмУ3 Gen-Attributes ;
икеле+Adv+Temp+Indet+Gen+Indet+Abl:икеленде Clitics ;
истяко+Adv:истяко Clitics ;
истя+Adv:истя Gen-Attributes ;
истяня+Adv:истяня Clitics ;
ки+Noun+CX+Prol:киява Nouns1_A_SGDET ;
ковия+Adv+Spatial+Lat+Prt:ковия Clitics ;
куватьс+Adv+Temp+Ill:куватьс Clitics ;
лацо+Prt+OldOrth+Ine:лацо Gen-Attributes ;
маныть+Adv+Temp:манытИ3 Gen-Attributes ;
мейгенерть+Adv+Manner:мейгенерть Clitics ;
мейле+Adv+Temp:мейле Clitics ;
мекевлангт+Adv:мекевлангт Clitics ;
мекевланк+Adv+OldOrth:мекевланк Clitics ;
мелят+Adv+Temp:мелятУ3 Gen-Attributes ;
мелень+Adv+Temp+Gen:мелень Clitics ;
можна+Adv+Foreign:можна Tenses1 ;
нацяс+Prt+Ill:нацяс Clitics ;
овсе+Prt:овсе Clitics ;
овсе+Dial+Prt:овси Clitics ;
окойники+Adv+Temp:окойники Gen-Attributes ;
пек+Ad-A:пекИ3 Gen-Attributes ;
пецек+Adv+Coll:пецек Gen-Attributes ;
рана+Adv+Temp:рана Gen-Attributes ;
салава+Prt+Prol:салава Gen-Attributes ;
састо+Adv:састо Gen-Attributes ;
седе+Prt:седе Clitics ;
семс+Pron+Temp+Ill:семс Clitics ;
сеньсэ+Pron+Gen+Ine:сеньсэ Clitics ;
сеньстэ+Pron+Gen+Ela:сеньстэ Clitics ;
сеедьстэ+Adv+Temp:сеедьстэ Gen-Attributes ;
сеедьстэ+Adv+Temp+OldOrth:сеетьстэ Gen-Attributes ;
сёксня+Prt:сёксня Gen-Attributes ;
тев+Adv+Spatial:тев Clitics ;
тезэ+Pron+Adv+Ill:тезэ Clitics ;
тезэнь+Pron+Adv+Ill:тезэнь Clitics ;
тей+Adv+Spatial+Lat:тей Clitics ;
тельня+Prt+Temp:тельня Gen-Attributes ;
теньсэ+Pron+Gen+Ine:теньсэ Clitics ;
теньстэ+Pron+Gen+Ela:теньстэ Clitics ;
течимс+Adv+Ill:течимс Clitics ;
тов+Adv+Spatial+Lat:тов Clitics ;
тозо+Adv+Dial+Spatial+Ill:тозо Clitics ;
тозонь+Adv+Spatial+Ill:тозонь Clitics ;
тунда+Prt:тунда Gen-Attributes ;
улкоть+Prt+Temp:улкоть Gen-Attributes ;
чокшне+Prt+Temp:чокшне Gen-Attributes ;
чокшнэ+Prt+Temp:чокшнэ Gen-Attributes ;
чопоньбелев+Adv+Lat:чопоньбелевИ3 Gen-Attributes ;
чопоньбелес+Adv+Ill:чопоньбелес Clitics ;
авидем+NCom+Anim+Assoc+Kin:авиде Possessives2 ;
васолбодидем+NCom+Anim+Assoc+Kin:васолбодиде Possessives2 ;
лелидем+NCom+Anim+Assoc+Kin:лелиде Possessives2 ;
тетидем+NCom+Anim+Assoc+Kin:тетиде Possessives2 ;
кис+Postp+Ill:кис Clitics ;
коряс+Postp+Ill:коряс Clitics ;
коряс+Postp:корязо Possessives2 ;
кувалт+Postp:кувалт Clitics ;
кувалма+Postp:кувалма Possessives1 ;
перть+Postp:перть Clitics ;
эйс+Postp+Ill:эйс Clitics ;
эйс+Postp+Ill:эйзэ Possessives2 ;
эйс+Postp+Ill+OldOrth:эзэзэ Possessives2 ;
эйстэде+Postp+Ela+Abl:эйстэде Possessives2 ;
эська+Postp+Prol:эська Possessives2 ;
